Maryland, session 2025, HB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1383*

HOUSE BILL 1383
Article – Education
8–404.
(a) The State Board shall adopt, as regulations, standards for the identification,
evaluation, educational placement, and the provision of a free appropriate public education
of each child in this State who has begun the school year under the age of 21 and is found
to need special education and related services, whether or not the child is receiving
nonduplicative services from another governmental agency.
(b) Before these standards are adopted, the State Board shall consult with public
and private agencies and persons who are concerned with and knowledgeable about the
educational needs of children with disabilities who require special education and related
services.
(c) The standards for the education of a child with a disability who is enrolled in
a school that is operated by an agency other than a local school system may not be lower
than the standards for the education of a child with a disability who is enrolled in a school
that is operated by a local school system. The standards for the approval of schools located
in jurisdictions outside Maryland shall be the same as standards applicable to the approval
of schools within Maryland. However, no school located in a jurisdiction outside Maryland
shall be approved if the charges for pupils approved by the Department are higher than
charges for pupils from any other state for the same services, unless waived by the State
Superintendent.
(d) The standards shall include:
(1) The required qualifications for teachers, administrators, and other
professionals serving a child with a disability;
(2) Procedures for the identification, evaluation, educational placement,
and provision of a free appropriate public education for a child with a disability who
requires the provision of special education and related services;
(3) Guidelines for curricula, instructional materials, equipment, and the
organization, administration, and supervision of the program, including accounting,
auditing, and reporting procedures;
(4) MINIMUM FUNCTIONAL AND TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS TO
ENSURE OPTIMAL PERFORMANCE OF THE STATE’S ONLINE SPECIAL EDUCATION
SYSTEM, INCLUDING THE MARYLAND ONLINE INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION
PROGRAM AND THE MARYLAND ONLINE INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE PLAN;
[(4)] (5) Provisions for local, regional, and State day and residential
centers for children with disabilities who cannot be served appropriately in the public
schools;

HOUSE BILL 1383 3
[(5)] (6) Coordination of these special education services with services
given by any other government agency; and
[(6)] (7) Guidelines for approval of placement in nonpublic schools or
facilities if appropriate public services are not available.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The State Department of Education shall study minimum functional and
technical requirements to ensure optimal performance of the State’s online special
education system, including the Maryland Online Individualized Education Program and
the Maryland Online Individualized Family Service Plan, to implement the State Board of
Education’s regulatory requirements under § 8–404(d)(4) of the Education Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the State
Department of Education shall:
(1) ensure that the State’s online special education system is:
(i) a secure, user–friendly, and web–based platform that serves as a
dynamic tool to allow real–time monitoring of student demographic and disability
information for use by family, teachers, staff, and administrators to help students thrive;
(ii) capable of tracking important events and deadlines to notify all
stakeholders of important information and developments related to a student;
(iii) able to store, allow access to, and allow for the processing of
documents related to a student;
(iv) adaptable to short–term and long–term updates and changes
necessary to address the system’s growing and evolving needs; and
(v) compliant with all relevant federal and State laws and
regulations, including federal and State privacy laws and regulations;
(2) perform a technical review of the State’s online special education
system; and
(3) compare the results of the technical review under item (2) of this
subsection with other systems currently available.
(c) On or before October 1, 2025, the State Department of Education shall report
the results of the study to the State Board of Education.

HOUSE BILL 1383
(d) On or before December 1, 2025, the State Board of Education shall report to
the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly on:
(1) the results of the study; and
(2) the status of proposed regulations to implement the standards required
under § 8–404(d)(4) of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the duties of the State Board
of Education under the Administrative Procedure Act.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.